Utah statutes.
58-44a-103.   Certified Nurse Midwife Education and Enforcement Account.
(1)  There is created a restricted account within the General Fund known as
the "Certified Nurse Midwife Education and Enforcement Account."
(2)  The restricted account shall be nonlapsing and consist of:
(a)  administrative penalties imposed under Section 58-44a-402; and
(b)  interest earned on money in the account.
(3) Money in the account may be appropriated by the Legislature for the
following purposes:
(a)  education and training of licensees under this chapter;
(b)  enforcement of this chapter by:
(i)  investigating unprofessional or unlawful conduct;
(ii)  providing legal representation to the division when legal action is
taken against a person engaging in unprofessional or unlawful conduct; and
(iii)  monitoring compliance of renewal requirements; and
(c)  education and training of board members.
